Utah statutes.
41-6a-603.   Speed limits established by counties and municipalities.

(1)  A county or municipality may determine the reasonable and safe speed limit for each highway or section of highway under its jurisdiction as specified under Title 72, Chapter 3, Highway Jurisdiction and Classification Act.

(2)  Each speed limit shall be established in accordance with the provisions of Subsections 41-6a-602(1), (2), (3), and (5).

